Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.082

Designation of electors.

For each elector position in this state, a political party contesting the position, or an unaffiliated presidential candidate, shall submit to the secretary of state the names of two qualified individuals. One of the individuals must be designated "elector nominee" and the other "alternate elector nominee." Except as otherwise provided in RCW 29A.56.086 through 29A.56.092, this state's electors are the winning elector nominees under the laws of this state.

[ 2019 c 143 s 3.]

NOTES:

Short title—Uniformity of application and construction—2019 c 143: See notes following RCW 29A.56.080.